Louisiana, session 2026, HB1251.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 26:71(A)(8) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§71. Permits required; fees; exception
A. Except as provided in Subsections B and C of this Section, before
engaging in the business of manufacturing, supplying, or dealing in alcoholic
beverages, all persons shall obtain from the commissioner, according to established
rules and regulations, a permit to conduct each separate business and shall pay the
commissioner a fee not to exceed the amounts provided for in the following schedule
and in accordance with regulations promulgated pursuant to the provisions of the
Administrative Procedure Act for each year the permit is valid:
* * *
(8) In-state manufacturing distillers that distill less than one hundred gallons
- one hundred dollars.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.